Massachusetts, session 194th, S2426.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 9D the
following section:-
Section 9E. (a) As used in this section, the following terms shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Aftermarket safety glass replacement”, motor vehicle safety glass replacement services
that occur after the original installation by a vehicle manufacturer.
“Safety glass”, as defined in section 9A.
of 2

(b) The registrar shall compile, maintain and publish a list, by name, of the type of glass
approved by the registrar as conforming to the specifications and requirements of safety glass as
set forth in this section.
(c) The registrar shall adopt regulations establishing standards and requirements for
aftermarket safety glass replacement that:
(1) require that the products and services used meet or exceed original equipment
manufacturer specifications;
(2) require the use of safety glass that meets American National Standards Institute Z
26.1 in accordance with 49 CFR § 571.205 and any other applicable federal motor vehicle safety
standards; and
(3) meet or exceed the standards and requirements of the Automotive Glass Replacement
Safety Standard, developed by the Auto Glass Safety Council under the auspices of the
American National Standards Institute.
(d) (1) The registrar shall not register any motor vehicle unless it is equipped with
approved safety glass.
(2) The registrar shall suspend the registration of any motor vehicle that the registrar
finds is not equipped with approved safety glass until the vehicle is equipped with approved
safety glass pursuant to this section.
of 2